Tennessee, session 114, HB0778.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1.
The office of research and education accountability (OREA), in the office of the
comptroller of the treasury, shall study and make recommendations for the
implementation of an incentive program for educators who have fifteen (15) or more
years' experience in education. OREA shall report its findings and recommendations for
implementation of the incentive program to the education committee of the senate and
the committee of the house of representatives having jurisdiction over educator benefits
by December 31, 2025.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0778
002802
- 1 -